translate/lexd/v.lexd
wиӡидоw:освобождать
wиӡидоw:сметать
wиӡидоw:чистить
wиӡид:освобождать
wиӡид:сметать
wиӡид:чистить
wиӡин:сметать
wиӡин:чистить
wиӡи:освобождать
wиӡи:сметать
wиӡи:чистить
wиӡ:помещаться
wиӡҷ:помещаться
wиӡӣδ:освобождать
wиӡӣδ:сметать
wиӡӣδ:чистить
wиӡӣδҷ:освобождать
wиӡӣδҷ:сметать
wиӡӣδҷ:чистить
wиӡӣн:освобождать
wиӡӣн:сметать
wиӡӣнт:освобождать
wиӡӣнт:сметать
wиӡӣнт:чистить
wиӡӣн:чистить
wозд:плавать
wозд:плевать
wоз:плавать
wоз:плевать
wойāф:стремиться
wойāфтоw:стремиться
wойāфт:стремиться
wойāфч:стремиться
wой:ахать_да_охать
wой:ныть
wойт:ахать_да_охать
wойт:ныть
wойтоw:ахать_да_охать
wойтоw:ныть
wойч:ахать_да_охать
wойч:ныть
wол:высиживать_яйца
wол:двигаться
wол:прорастать
wол:сидеть_на_яйцах
wолт:высиживать_яйца
wолт:двигаться
wолтоw:высиживать_яйца
wолтоw:двигаться
wолтоw:прорастать
wолтоw:сидеть_на_яйцах
wолт:прорастать
wолт:сидеть_на_яйцах
wолч:высиживать_яйца
wолч:двигаться
wолч:прорастать
wолч:сидеть_на_яйцах
wорвд:кипеть
wорвд:шевелиться
wорв:кипеть
wорв:шевелиться
wоф:выдумывать
wофт:выдумывать
wоф:ткать
wофт:ткать
wох̌:лишаться
wох̌:мерзнуть
wох̌:оказываться
wох̌:падать
wох̌:появляться
wох̌:проваливаться
wох̌:рваться
wох̌т:лишаться
wох̌т:мерзнуть
wох̌т:оказываться
wох̌т:падать
wох̌т:появляться
wох̌т:проваливаться
wох̌т:рваться
wу̊й:ахать_да_охать
wу̊й:ныть
wу̊йт:ахать_да_охать
wу̊йт:ныть
wу̊йтоw:ахать_да_охать
wу̊йтоw:ныть
wу̊йч:ахать_да_охать
wу̊йч:ныть
wу̊ғд:мычать
wу̊ғдоw:мычать
wу̊ғдоw:реветь
wу̊ғд:реветь
wу̊ғ:мычать
wу̊ғ:реветь
wу̊ғҷ:мычать
wу̊ғҷ:реветь
wуз:двигаться
wузд:двигаться
wузд:копошиться
wуздоw:двигаться
wуздоw:копошиться
wуз:копошиться
wузҷ:двигаться
wузҷ:копошиться
wурзд:дрожать
wурздоw:дрожать
wурз:дрожать
wурзҷ:дрожать
wух:кашлять
wухт:кашлять
wухтоw:кашлять
wухч:кашлять
wуц:двигаться
wуцен:двигать
wуцен:двигаться
wуцент:двигать
wуцент:двигаться
wуцентоw:двигать
wуцентоw:двигаться
wуценч:двигать
wуценч:двигаться
wуц:качаться
wуц:работать_не_торопясь
wуцт:двигаться
wуцт:качаться
wуцтоw:двигаться
wуцтоw:качаться
wуцтоw:работать_не_торопясь
wуцт:работать_не_торопясь
wуцч:двигаться
wуцч:качаться
wуцч:работать_не_торопясь
wуқсен:вызывать_тошноту
wуқсент:вызывать_тошноту
wуқсентоw:вызывать_тошноту
wуқсенч:вызывать_тошноту
wӣδу̊ӡдоw:расщеплять
wӣδу̊ӡдоw:теребить
wӣδу̊ӡдоw:терзать
wӣδу̊ӡд:расщеплять
wӣδу̊ӡд:теребить
wӣδу̊ӡд:терзать
wӣδу̊ӡ:расщеплять
wӣδу̊ӡ:теребить
wӣδу̊ӡ:терзать
wӣн:видеть
wӣн:видеться
wӣнт:видеть
wӣнт:видеться
wӣнтоw:видеть
wӣнтоw:видеться
wӣнч:видеть
wӣнч:видеться
wӣрвд:кипеть
wӣрвдоw:кипеть
wӣрвдоw:шевелиться
wӣрвд:шевелиться
wӣрв:кипеть
wӣрв:шевелиться
wӣрвҷ:кипеть
wӣрвҷ:шевелиться
wӣф:выдумывать
wӣфт:выдумывать
wӣф:ткать
wӣфтоw:выдумывать
wӣфтоw:ткать
wӣфт:ткать
wӣфч:выдумывать
wӣфч:ткать
wӣх̌:плавать
wӣх̌:плевать
wӣх̌тоw:плавать
wӣх̌тоw:плевать
wӣх̌т:плавать
wӣх̌т:плевать
wӣх̌ч:плавать
wӣх̌ч:плевать
āндой:вставать
āндойд:вставать
ɣ̌āш:браниться
ɣ̌āш:звенеть
ɣ̌āш:лаять
ɣ̌ален:звенеть
ɣ̌алент:звенеть
ɣ̌алентоw:звенеть
ɣ̌аленч:звенеть
ɣ̌ал:лязгать
ɣ̌алт:лязгать
ɣ̌алтоw:лязгать
ɣ̌алу̊н:звенеть
ɣ̌алу̊н:звонко_петь
ɣ̌алу̊нт:звенеть
ɣ̌алу̊нт:звонко_петь
ɣ̌алу̊нтоw:звенеть
ɣ̌алу̊нтоw:звонко_петь
ɣ̌алу̊нч:звенеть
ɣ̌алу̊нч:звонко_петь
ɣ̌алч:лязгать
ɣ̌ибу̊г:бить
ɣ̌ибу̊гҷ:бить
ɣ̌ибу̊нг:бить
ɣ̌ибу̊нгт:бить
ɣ̌ибу̊нгтоw:бить
ɣ̌ибу̊нгч:бить
ɣ̌иму̊ӡд:замуровывать
ɣ̌иму̊ӡдоw:замуровывать
ɣ̌иму̊ӡ:замуровывать
ɣ̌имӣйд:замуровывать
ɣ̌имӣйдоw:замуровывать
ɣ̌имӣй:замуровывать
ɣ̌имӯйд:замуровывать
ɣ̌имӯй:замуровывать
ɣ̌имӯйҷ:замуровывать
ɣ̌ол:разбрызгивать
ɣ̌олтоw:разбрызгивать
ɣ̌олт:разбрызгивать
ɣ̌олч:разбрызгивать
ɣ̌ош:браниться
ɣ̌ош:звенеть
ɣ̌ош:лаять
ɣ̌ошт:браниться
ɣ̌ошт:звенеть
ɣ̌ошт:лаять
ɣ̌у̊л:разбрызгивать
ɣ̌у̊лтоw:разбрызгивать
ɣ̌у̊лт:разбрызгивать
ɣ̌у̊лч:разбрызгивать
ɣ̌ӣб:брызгать
ɣ̌ӣбт:брызгать
ɣ̌ӣбтоw:брызгать
ɣ̌ӣбч:брызгать
ɣ̌ӣп:брызгать
ɣ̌ӣпт:брызгать
ɣ̌ӣптоw:брызгать
ɣ̌ӣпч:брызгать
ɣ̌ӣф:брызгать
ɣ̌ӣфт:брызгать
ɣ̌ӣфтоw:брызгать
ɣ̌ӣфч:брызгать
ɣ̌ӣш:браниться
ɣ̌ӣш:звенеть
ɣ̌ӣш:лаять
ɣ̌ӣшт:браниться
ɣ̌ӣшт:звенеть
ɣ̌ӣшт:лаять
ɣ̌ӣштоw:браниться
ɣ̌ӣштоw:звенеть
ɣ̌ӣштоw:лаять
ɣ̌ӣшч:браниться
ɣ̌ӣшч:звенеть
ɣ̌ӣшч:лаять
δê:бить
δê:бодать
δê:бросать
δê:бросаться
δê:в_конструкциях_с_кратким_инфинитивом_других_глаголов
δê:воздействовать
δê:вспомогательный_глагол
δê:вспомогательный_глагол_образует_сложноименные_глаголы_среднего_значения
δê:выдавать_замуж
δê:выпадать
δê:давать
δê:давить
δêд:бить
δêд:бодать
δêд:бросать
δêд:бросаться
δêд:в_конструкциях_с_кратким_инфинитивом_других_глаголов
δêд:воздействовать
δêд:вспомогательный_глагол
δêд:вспомогательный_глагол_образует_сложноименные_глаголы_среднего_значения
δêд:выдавать_замуж
δêд:выпадать
δêд:давать
δêд:давить
δêд:делать
δê:делать
δêд:играть
δêд:касаться
δêд:лопать
δêдоw:бить
δêдоw:бодать
δêдоw:бросать
δêдоw:бросаться
δêдоw:в_конструкциях_с_кратким_инфинитивом_других_глаголов
δêдоw:воздействовать
δêдоw:вспомогательный_глагол
δêдоw:вспомогательный_глагол_образует_сложноименные_глаголы_среднего_значения
δêдоw:выдавать_замуж
δêдоw:выпадать
δêдоw:давать
δêдоw:давить
δêдоw:делать
δêдоw:играть
δêдоw:касаться
δêдоw:лопать
δêдоw:одеваться
δêдоw:падать
δêдоw:передвигаться
δêдоw:помещать
δêдоw:попадать
δêдоw:попасть
δêдоw:пуститься
δêдоw:разбивать
δêдоw:ругать
δêдоw:связывать
δêдоw:случаться
δêдоw:точить
δêдоw:тратить
δêдоw:убивать
δêдоw:ударять
δêдоw:ударяться
δêд:одеваться
δêд:падать
δêд:передвигаться
δêд:помещать
δêд:попадать
δêд:попасть
δêд:пуститься
δêд:разбивать
δêд:ругать
δêд:связывать
δêд:случаться
δêд:точить
δêд:тратить
δêд:убивать
δêд:ударять
δêд:ударяться
δê:играть
δê:касаться
δêк:заставлять
δêкт:заставлять
δêктоw:заставлять
δêкч:заставлять
δê:лопать
δê:одеваться
δê:падать
δê:передвигаться
δê:помещать
δê:попадать
δê:попасть
δê:пуститься
δê:разбивать
δêр:иметь
δêрт:иметь
δêртоw:иметь
δêртоw:только_как_второй_элемент_в_сложноименных_глаголах_с_различным_значением
δêр:только_как_второй_элемент_в_сложноименных_глаголах_с_различным_значением
δêрт:только_как_второй_элемент_в_сложноименных_глаголах_с_различным_значением
δê:ругать
δêрч:только_как_второй_элемент_в_сложноименных_глаголах_с_различным_значением
δê:связывать
δê:случаться
δê:точить
δê:тратить
δê:убивать
δê:ударять
δê:ударяться
δêц:в_конструкциях_с_кратким_инфинитивом_других_глаголов
δêц:вспомогательный_глагол_образует_сложноименные_глаголы_среднего_значения
δêц:падать
δêц:попадать
δêц:случаться
δêц:ударяться
δāδ:бодать
δāδ:бросать
δāδ:бросаться
δāδ:воздействовать
δāδ:вспомогательный_глагол
δāδ:выдавать_замуж
δāδ:давать
δāδ:давить
δāδ:делать
δāδе:бодать
δāδе:бросать
δāδе:бросаться
δāδе:воздействовать
δāδе:вспомогательный_глагол
δāδе:выдавать_замуж
δāδе:давать
δāδе:давить
δāδе:делать
δāδе:играть
δāδе:касаться
δāδе:лопать
δāδен:бодать
δāδен:бросать
δāδен:бросаться
δāδен:воздействовать
δāδен:вспомогательный_глагол
δāδен:выдавать_замуж
δāδен:давать
δāδен:давить
δāδен:делать
δāδен:играть
δāδен:касаться
δāδен:лопать
δāδен:одеваться
δāδен:передвигаться
δāδен:помещать
δāδен:разбивать
δāδен:ругать
δāδен:связывать
δāδен:точить
δāδен:тратить
δāδен:убивать
δāδен:ударять
δāδе:одеваться
δāδе:передвигаться
δāδе:помещать
δāδе:разбивать
δāδе:ругать
δāδе:связывать
δāδет:бодать
δāδет:бросать
δāδет:бросаться
δāδет:воздействовать
δāδет:вспомогательный_глагол
δāδет:выдавать_замуж
δāδет:давать
δāδет:давить
δāδет:делать
δāδет:играть
δāδет:касаться
δāδет:лопать
δāδет:одеваться
δāδе:точить
δāδет:передвигаться
δāδет:помещать
δāδет:разбивать
δāδе:тратить
δāδет:ругать
δāδет:связывать
δāδет:точить
δāδет:тратить
δāδет:убивать
δāδет:ударять
δāδе:убивать
δāδе:ударять
δāδ:играть
δāδ:касаться
δāδ:лопать
δāδ:одеваться
δāδ:передвигаться
δāδ:помещать
δāδ:разбивать
δāδ:ругать
δāδ:связывать
δāδ:точить
δāδ:тратить
δāδ:убивать
δāδ:ударять
δāδум:бодать
δāδум:бросать
δāδум:бросаться
δāδум:воздействовать
δāδум:вспомогательный_глагол
δāδум:выдавать_замуж
δāδум:давать
δāδум:давить
δāδум:делать
δāδум:играть
δāδум:касаться
δāδум:лопать
δāδум:одеваться
δāδум:передвигаться
δāδум:помещать
δāδум:разбивать
δāδум:ругать
δāδум:связывать
δāδум:точить
δāδум:тратить
δāδум:убивать
δāδум:ударять
δā:бодать
δā:бросать
δā:бросаться
δā:воздействовать
δā:вспомогательный_глагол
δā:выдавать_замуж
δā:давать
δā:давить
δā:делать
δā:играть
δā:касаться
δā:лопать
δāм:бодать
δāм:бросать
δāм:бросаться
δāм:воздействовать
δāм:вспомогательный_глагол
δāм:выдавать_замуж
δāм:давать
δāм:давить
δāм:делать
δāм:играть
δāм:касаться
δāм:лопать
δāм:одеваться
δāм:передвигаться
δāм:помещать
δāм:разбивать
δāм:ругать
δāм:связывать
δāм:точить
δāм:тратить
δāм:убивать
δāм:ударять
δā:одеваться
δā:передвигаться
δā:помещать
δā:разбивать
δā:ругать
δā:связывать
δā:точить
δā:тратить
δā:убивать
δā:ударять
δа:бодать
δа:бросать
δа:бросаться
δа:воздействовать
δа:вспомогательный_глагол
δа:выдавать_замуж
δа:давать
δа:давить
δа:делать
δа:играть
δай:в_конструкциях_с_кратким_инфинитивом_других_глаголов
δай:вспомогательный_глагол_образует_сложноименные_глаголы_среднего_значения
δай:падать
δай:попадать
δай:случаться
δай:ударяться
δа:касаться
δак:лизать
δак:растрачивать
δакт:лизать
δактоw:лизать
δактоw:растрачивать
δакт:растрачивать
δа:лопать
δа:одеваться
δа:передвигаться
δа:помещать
δа:разбивать
δа:ругать
δа:связывать
δа:точить
δа:тратить
δа:убивать
δа:ударять
δаҳ:бодать
δаҳ:бросать
δаҳ:бросаться
δаҳ:воздействовать
δаҳ:вспомогательный_глагол
δаҳ:выдавать_замуж
δаҳ:давать
δаҳ:давить
δаҳ:делать
δаҳ:играть
δаҳ:касаться
δаҳ:лопать
δаҳ:одеваться
δаҳ:передвигаться
δаҳ:помещать
δаҳ:разбивать
δаҳ:ругать
δаҳ:связывать
δаҳ:точить
δаҳ:тратить
δаҳ:убивать
δаҳ:ударять
δе:бодать
δе:бросать
δе:бросаться
δе:в_конструкциях_с_кратким_инфинитивом_других_глаголов
δе:воздействовать
δе:вспомогательный_глагол
δе:вспомогательный_глагол_образует_сложноименные_глаголы_среднего_значения
δе:выдавать_замуж
δе:выпадать
δе:давать
δе:давить
δед:в_конструкциях_с_кратким_инфинитивом_других_глаголов
δед:вспомогательный_глагол_образует_сложноименные_глаголы_среднего_значения
δед:выпадать
δе:делать
δед:падать
δед:попадать
δед:попасть
δед:пуститься
δед:случаться
δед:ударяться
δе:играть
δе:касаться
δе:лопать
δен:бодать
δен:бросать
δен:бросаться
δен:в_конструкциях_с_кратким_инфинитивом_других_глаголов
δен:воздействовать
δен:вспомогательный_глагол
δен:вспомогательный_глагол_образует_сложноименные_глаголы_среднего_значения
δен:выдавать_замуж
δен:выпадать
δен:давать
δен:давить
δен:делать
δен:играть
δен:касаться
δен:лопать
δен:одеваться
δен:падать
δен:передвигаться
δен:помещать
δен:попадать
δен:попасть
δен:пуститься
δен:разбивать
δен:ругать
δен:связывать
δен:случаться
δен:точить
δен:тратить
δен:убивать
δен:ударять
δен:ударяться
δе:одеваться
δе:падать
δе:передвигаться
δе:помещать
δе:попадать
δе:попасть
δе:пуститься
δе:разбивать
δе:ругать
δе:связывать
δе:случаться
δет:бодать
δет:бросать
δет:бросаться
δет:в_конструкциях_с_кратким_инфинитивом_других_глаголов
δет:воздействовать
δет:вспомогательный_глагол
δет:вспомогательный_глагол_образует_сложноименные_глаголы_среднего_значения
δет:выдавать_замуж
δет:выпадать
δет:давать
δет:давить
δет:делать
δет:играть
δет:касаться
δет:лопать
δет:одеваться
δе:точить
δет:падать
δет:передвигаться
δет:помещать
δет:попадать
δет:попасть
δет:пуститься
δет:разбивать
δе:тратить
δет:ругать
δет:связывать
δет:случаться
δет:точить
δет:тратить
δет:убивать
δет:ударять
δет:ударяться
δе:убивать
δе:ударять
δе:ударяться
δи:в_конструкциях_с_кратким_инфинитивом_других_глаголов
δи:вспомогательный_глагол_образует_сложноименные_глаголы_среднего_значения
δи:выпадать
δий:в_конструкциях_с_кратким_инфинитивом_других_глаголов
δий:вспомогательный_глагол_образует_сложноименные_глаголы_среднего_значения
δийе:в_конструкциях_с_кратким_инфинитивом_других_глаголов
δийе:вспомогательный_глагол_образует_сложноименные_глаголы_среднего_значения
δийе:выпадать
δийен:в_конструкциях_с_кратким_инфинитивом_других_глаголов
δийен:вспомогательный_глагол_образует_сложноименные_глаголы_среднего_значения
δийен:выпадать
δийен:падать
δийен:попадать
δийен:попасть
δийен:пуститься
δийен:случаться
δийен:ударяться
δийе:падать
δийе:попадать
δийе:попасть
δийе:пуститься
δийе:случаться
δийет:в_конструкциях_с_кратким_инфинитивом_других_глаголов
δийет:вспомогательный_глагол_образует_сложноименные_глаголы_среднего_значения
